Illinois, session 104th, HB5312.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Township Code is amended by changing 5Section 45-50 as follows: 6    (60 ILCS 1/45-50)7    Sec. 45-50. Caucus procedures. 8    (a) The rules of procedure for conducting a township or 9multi-township caucus must be approved and may be amended by a 10majority vote of the qualified participants attending the 11caucus. No participant shall be able to participate or vote at 12any township or multi-township caucus if the person is or was 13at anytime during the 12 months before the caucus any of the 14following:15        (1) An elected or appointed public official of another 16    established political party.17        (2) An elected or appointed officer, director, 18    precinct committeeman or representative of the township 19    committeeman of another established political party.20        (3) A judge of election under Article 13 or 14 of the 21    Election Code for another statewide established political 22    party.23        (4) A voter who voted in the primary election of   HB5312- 2 -LRB104 20630 WRO 34126 b1    another statewide established political party different 2    from the party holding the caucus. 3    (b) The rules of procedure shall include the following:4        (1) No caucus shall commence earlier than 6:00 p.m.5        (2) The caucus shall commence at the place specified 6    in the notice of caucus.7        (3) Procedures by which qualified caucus participants 8    determine by a majority vote the duties of caucus judges 9    of election. Caucus judges of election shall be appointed 10    by a majority vote of the township or multi-township 11    central committee. No judge of the Supreme Court, 12    appellate court, or circuit court or associate judge shall 13    serve as a caucus judge of election.14        (4) Nominations for selection as a candidate shall be 15    accepted from any qualified participant of the caucus.16        (5) The method of voting (i.e., written ballot, voice 17    vote, show of hands, standing vote) for determining the 18    candidate or candidates selected for nomination.19        (6) Whether candidates will be selected as a slate or 20    as individual nominees for each office.21        (7) Whether written notice of intent to be a caucus 22    nominee is required.23        (8) Other rules deemed necessary by the central 24    committee at the time the rules are promulgated or by the 25    majority of the qualified caucus participants when the 26    rules are being considered at their meeting.  HB5312- 3 -LRB104 20630 WRO 34126 b1        (9) A participant in a caucus shall be entitled to 2    only one vote for each office for which he or she is 3    voting. A participant's vote shall not be weighted to be 4    equal to more than one vote. 5    (c) Individuals participating at an established political 6party township or multi-township caucus shall comply with each 7of the following:8        (1) A participant shall be registered under Article 4, 9    5, or 6 of the Election Code.10        (2) A participant shall be registered within the 11    territory for which the nomination is made.12        (3) A participant shall sign an affidavit that he or 13    she is a registered voter and affiliated with the 14    established political party holding the caucus.15        (4) A participant shall not take part in the 16    proceedings of more than one established political party 17    township and multi-township caucus for the same election. 18    This requirement also applies to the township and 19    multi-township clerks.20        (5) A participant shall not, before or after 21    participating in a township or multi-township caucus, sign 22    a petition of nomination for an independent or new 23    political party candidate for the same election.24        (6) A participant shall not become an independent 25    candidate or a candidate of another established political 26    party or a new political party for the same election.  HB5312- 4 -LRB104 20630 WRO 34126 b1    (d) The voters participating at an established political 2party township or multi-township caucus shall not select for 3nomination more candidates than there are to be elected for 4each office.5    (e) No candidate for nomination at a township or 6multi-township caucus shall be required to do either of the 7following:8        (1) Circulate and file nominating petitions to become 9    a candidate at the caucus.10        (2) File a fee to become a candidate at the caucus.11    (f) For purposes of this Section "same election" means an 12election in the same township office held during the same 13election cycle. 14(Source: P.A. 100-219, eff. 8-18-17.)